Connecticut, session 2026, HB05410.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
Section 1. (NEW) (Effective October 1, 2026) (a) There is established a
veterans' housing program through which the Commissioner of
Housing, in coordination with the Commissioner of Veterans Affairs,
may provide housing to any qualifying veteran, at no cost to such
veteran, in the form of a prefabricated structure upon the grounds of the
Department of Veterans Affairs in Rocky Hill.
(b) Each prefabricated structure described in subsection (a) of this
section shall have an area of not less than five hundred square feet, shall
have insulated exterior walls and shall include two bedrooms, a full
kitchen and a bathroom.
(c) On and after January 1, 2027, a veteran, as defined in section 27-
103 of the general statutes, whose income falls below the federal poverty
line and who is able to demonstrate having been without a permanent
residence for the immediately preceding ninety days, may apply to the
LCO No. 2194 1 of 3

Raised Bill No. 5410
Commissioners of Housing and Veterans Affairs, in a form and manner
prescribed by said commissioners, to receive housing under the
program established in subsection (a) of this section. Not later than ten
days after receipt of any such application, said commissioners shall
verify whether the applicant qualifies for such housing and shall notify
such applicant of the commissioners' determination as to approval or
rejection of such application. Any such approval shall be for one year,
after which a veteran may reapply under this subsection.
(d) Any veteran whose application under subsection (d) of this
section has been approved shall be permitted to occupy a prefabricated
structure described in subsection (a) of this section, if available, not later
than sixty days after such approval, provided either the Commissioner
of Housing or Commissioner of Veterans Affairs may revoke such
approval or place restrictions or other conditions upon such occupancy
in cases where an occupant is posing a risk to the health, safety, security
or well-being of other occupants or the integrity of any prefabricated
structure.
(e) Not later than January 15, 2028, and annually thereafter, the
Commissioners of Housing and Veterans Affairs shall jointly submit a
report on the performance of the veterans housing program established
in subsection (a) of this section, and any recommendations for
improvement thereof, to the joint standing committees of the General
Assembly having cognizance of matters relating to housing and
veterans' and military affairs, in accordance with the provisions of
section 11-4a of the general statutes.
This act shall take effect as follows and shall amend the following
sections:
Section 1 October 1, 2026 New section